North Carolina, session 2025, HB1237.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 1.1. Joshua Turner of Lee County is appointed to the Centennial
Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of Wendell Murphy.
SECTION 1.2. Ellen Sheppard of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Board of Proprietary Schools for a term expiring December 31, 2026, to fill the
unexpired term of Victor Riley.
SECTION 1.3. Harold "Dale" Willetts of Brunswick County is appointed to the
North Carolina Addiction Specialists Professional Practice Board for a term expiring June 30,
2028, to fill the unexpired term of Stephanie Robinson.
SECTION 1.4. John White of Guilford County is appointed to the North Carolina
Agricultural and Technical State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027,
to fill the unexpired term of Mark Copeland.
SECTION 1.5. Victoria Hedgecock of Randolph County is appointed to the North
Carolina Interpreters and Transliterators Licensing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.6. Dr. Brent Scarlett of Randolph County is appointed to the North
Carolina Veterinary Medical Board for a term expiring June 30, 2031.
SECTION 1.7. Walker B. Ferguson of Buncombe County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Board for the Licensing of Soil Scientists for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.8. George T. Ammons of Scotland County is reappointed to the Well
Contractors Certification Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.9. William A. Yow of Guilford County is reappointed to the Well
Contractors Certification Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.10. Krista Hurlbut of Wake County is appointed to the North Carolina
Child Care Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.11. Hope B. Haywood of Randolph County is appointed to the North
Carolina Child Care Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.12. Jennifer F. Jordan of Wayne County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Institute of Medicine Board of Directors for a term expiring December 31, 2030.
*H1237-v-3*

SECTION 1.13. James Jerome Cook of Forsyth County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Ports Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.14. Alexandra Smith of New Hanover County is appointed to the North
Carolina Dispute Resolution Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.15. Michael J. Slate of Brunswick County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Code Officials Qualification Board for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.16. Harlen M. Summey of Randolph County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Code Officials Qualification Board for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.17. H. Burns Blackwell of Guilford County is reappointed to the
Structural Pest Control Committee for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.18. Channing R. Jones of Robeson County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Youth Outdoor Engagement Commission for a term expiring September 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.19. Aaron K. Thomas of Robeson County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Youth Outdoor Engagement Commission for a term expiring September 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.20. William P. Aceto of Watauga County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Real Estate Commission for a term expiring July 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.21. Heath R. Jenkins of Lincoln County is reappointed to the Rural
Infrastructure Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.22. George R. Taylor of Bladen County is reappointed to the Rural
Infrastructure Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.23. Abena K. Jones-Boone of Wake County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Board of Recreational Therapy Licensure for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.24. Christopher Dobbins of Cleveland County is appointed to the North
Carolina On-Site Wastewater Contractors and Inspectors Certification Board for a term expiring
June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.25. Reverend Dr. Pierre Crawford of Gaston County is reappointed to
the North Carolina African American Heritage Commission for a term expiring September 30,
2029.
SECTION 1.26. Rick L. Singleton of Avery County is appointed to the North
Carolina Mining Commission for a term expiring December 31, 2030.
SECTION 1.27. Kevin Neil Lewis of Nash County is reappointed to the State Ethics
Commission for a term expiring December 31, 2030.
SECTION 1.28. Daniel A. Ward of Mecklenburg County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Investment Authority Board of Directors for a term expiring June 30, 2032.
SECTION 1.29. David B. Sutphin of Johnston County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Board of Funeral Service for a term expiring December 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.30. Julie Kennedy of Chatham County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Dietetics and Nutrition for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.31. Samuel Watts of Wake County is appointed to the Board of Trustees
of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.32. Sherry Heuser of Wake County is reappointed to the North Carolina
Partnership for Children, Inc., Board of Directors for a term expiring December 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.33. Dr. Sean R. Tikkun of Durham County is reappointed to the
Governor Morehead School for the Blind Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.34. Robert S. Boyette of Wilson County is reappointed to the Eastern
North Carolina School for the Deaf Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.35. Yvonne M. White of Burke County is reappointed to the North
Carolina School for the Deaf Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.36. Daniel Tingen of Wake County is reappointed to the North Carolina
Residential Code Council for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December 31, 2032.
Page 2 Session Law 2026-10 House Bill 1237

SECTION 1.37. Patrick Molamphy of Moore County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Board of Transportation for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.38. Roger Kumpf of Buncombe County is appointed to the
Asheville-Buncombe Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June
30, 2030.
SECTION 1.39. Brent Hood of Bladen County is reappointed to the Bladen
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.40. Cher Silvius of Henderson County is appointed to the Blue Ridge
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.41. C. Chase Keller of Caldwell County is reappointed to the Caldwell
Community College and Technical Institute Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.42. Dr. Marc Sosne of New Hanover County is reappointed to the Cape
Fear Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.43. Mark K. Hilton of Catawba County is appointed to the Catawba
Valley Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.44. Sam Shumate of Lee County is appointed to the Central Carolina
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.45. Anthony L. Downs of Davidson County is appointed to the
Davidson-Davie County Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2030.
SECTION 1.46. David Williford of Cumberland County is appointed to the
Fayetteville Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.47. Elizabeth Broyhill of Forsyth County is appointed to the Forsyth
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.48. Brian King of Rutherford County is appointed to the Isothermal
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.49. Anita Powers of Duplin County is reappointed to the James Sprunt
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.50. Lyn T. Austin of Johnston County is reappointed to the Johnston
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.51. Rodney Smith of Lenior County is appointed to the Lenoir
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.52. Robert Harris of Montgomery County is reappointed to the
Montgomery Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.53. George "Thomas" Joyner of Nash County is appointed to the Nash
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.54. Neal Driver of Pitt County is reappointed to the Pitt Community
College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.55. Dennis Mabe of Randolph County is reappointed to the Randolph
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.56. William Stewart Thomas of Scotland County is appointed to the
Richmond Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.57. Kyle Chavis of Robeson County is reappointed to the Robeson
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.58. Myla Barnhardt of Rockingham County is reappointed to the
Rockingham Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.59. Vanessa Miles of Rowan County is appointed to the
Rowan-Cabarrus Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.60. Dr. Paul Viser of Sampson County is reappointed to the Sampson
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
House Bill 1237 Session Law 2026-10 Page 3

SECTION 1.61. Timothy G. Bledsoe of Surry County is appointed to the Surry
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.62. Mike Stevenson of Cherokee County is reappointed to the
Tri-County Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.63. Elaine Trujillo of Vance County is reappointed to the
Vance-Granville Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.64. Larry D. Stone of Wilkes County is appointed to the Wilkes
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.65. David R. Swinney of Perquimans County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board for the Licensing of Soil Scientists for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.66. Jeanette K. Doran of Wake County is reappointed to the Rules
Review Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.67. John S. Hahn of Wake County is reappointed to the Rules Review
Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.68. Jeffrey T. Hyde of Guilford County is reappointed to the Rules
Review Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.69. Jeffrey Hughes of Durham County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Water Infrastructure Authority for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 1.70. Mary W. Tiger of Chatham County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Water Infrastructure Authority for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 1.71. Bryan E. Parker of Johnston County is appointed to the North
Carolina Housing Partnership for a term expiring August 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.72. Kasey E. Ginsberg of Wake County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Housing Partnership for a term expiring August 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.73. James Hendrick Pressly of Iredell County is reappointed to the
North Carolina Housing Partnership for a term expiring August 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.74. Thomas E. Smith of Wake County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Housing Partnership for a term expiring August 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.75. Owen Thomas of Robeson County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Housing Partnership for a term expiring August 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.76. Joseph Hollowell, Jr., of Chowan County is appointed to the North
Carolina Coastal Resources Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.77. Bryan Farris of Gaston County is appointed to the Gaston College
Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
PART II. SPEAKER'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 2.1. Kenneth S. "Scott" Page of Haywood County is appointed to the
Haywood Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the
unexpired term of W. Graham Bradley.
SECTION 2.2. Jennifer L. Robinson of McDowell County is appointed to the
Western Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2028, to
fill the unexpired term of Jonathan M. Mercer.
SECTION 2.3. Dr. Robert T. Morgan of Person County is appointed to the Piedmont
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2028, to fill the unexpired
term of Amy F. Edge.
SECTION 2.4. Bill Slagle of Mitchell County is appointed to the Mayland
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.5. Larry Westmoreland of Cherokee County is appointed to the
Tri-County Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029, to fill the
unexpired term of Lumpy Lampert.
Page 4 Session Law 2026-10 House Bill 1237

SECTION 2.6. Dr. Emily J. Catalano of Pitt County is appointed to the North
Carolina Brain Injury Council for a term expiring September 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term
of Dr. Edward Jauch.
SECTION 2.7. Mary "Kitty" E. Barringer of Guilford County is appointed to the
North Carolina Brain Injury Council for a term expiring September 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired
term of John L. Dickerhoff.
SECTION 2.8. The Honorable Tammi Z. Thurm of Guilford County is appointed to
the State Building Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028, to fill the unexpired term of
The Honorable Myron Yoder.
SECTION 2.9. Tonda R. Phillips of Surry County is appointed to the Domestic
Violence Commission for a term expiring August 31, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of Saira
Estrada.
SECTION 2.10. Jennifer M. Warwick of New Hanover County is appointed to the
North Carolina Board of Massage and Bodywork Therapy for a term expiring September 30,
2027, to fill the unexpired term of Laura L. Ford.
SECTION 2.11. Dr. Kevin O'Neil of New Hanover County is appointed to the North
Carolina Respiratory Care Board for a term expiring October 31, 2027, to fill the unexpired term
of Dr. James F. Davidson.
SECTION 2.12. Marcella Coley of Watauga County and Jack C. "Cal" Morgan of
New Hanover County are reappointed to the North Carolina Appraisal Board for terms expiring
June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.13. Brooke H. King of Wayne County and Christy L. Fyle of Wilson
County are reappointed to the North Carolina Child Care Commission for terms expiring June
30, 2028.
SECTION 2.14. Jill I. Homan of Johnston County is reappointed to the Economic
Investment Committee for a term beginning December 1, 2026, and expiring November 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.15. Kevin W. Earp of Johnston County is reappointed to the Eastern
North Carolina School for the Deaf Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.16. Sakiran Kolavennu of Wake County is reappointed to the
Information Technology Strategy Board for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring
December 31, 2028.
SECTION 2.17. Jana Chellaperumal of Wake County is appointed to the
Information Technology Strategy Board for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring
December 31, 2028.
SECTION 2.18. The Honorable Nelson Dollar of Wake County is reappointed to the
North Carolina Medical Board for a term beginning October 1, 2026, and expiring September
30, 2029.
SECTION 2.19. Ketan D. Patel of Wake County is appointed to the Commission for
Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services for a term expiring
June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.20. James C. Lister of New Hanover County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Oil and Gas Commission for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December
31, 2030.
SECTION 2.21. David R. Swinney of Pasquotank County is reappointed to the
North Carolina On-Site Wastewater Contractors and Inspectors Certification Board for a term
expiring July 1, 2029.
SECTION 2.22. James A. Galati of Wake County is reappointed to the State Board
of Proprietary Schools for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December 31, 2032.
SECTION 2.23. Claire R. Salisbury of Orange County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Recreational Therapy Licensure Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
House Bill 1237 Session Law 2026-10 Page 5

SECTION 2.24. E. Landon Weaver of Pitt County is appointed to the Residential
Code Council for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December 31, 2032.
SECTION 2.25. Sandra K. Turner of Burke County is reappointed to the North
Carolina School for the Deaf Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.26. Diane C. Riddle of Buncombe County is appointed to the North
Carolina Locksmith Licensing Board for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring
December 31, 2029.
PART III. CORRECTIONS
SECTION 3.1. Section 2.3 of S.L. 2025-90 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.3. David Longo of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the Metropolitan
Public Transportation Authority for a term of two four years to commence upon approval by the
Secretary of State of the articles of incorporation of the Metropolitan Public Transportation
Authority."
SECTION 3.2. Part II of S.L. 2025-1 reads as rewritten:
"…
"SECTION 2.5. Seth Ellington of Wake County is appointed to the Building Code Council
for a term expiring January 1, 2027.2029.
"SECTION 2.6. Paul Boney of New Hanover County is appointed to the Building Code
Council for a term expiring January 1, 2029.2031.
"SECTION 2.7. Mark Smith of Guilford County is appointed to the Building Code Council
for a term expiring January 1, 2031.2027."
PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act is effective when it becomes law. Unless otherwise provided,
terms begin upon the effective date of this act.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 22nd day of June, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Howard Penny, Jr.
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
Page 6 Session Law 2026-10 House Bill 1237